Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1268.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(d) of the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3. Definitions. When used in this act--* * *(d) The term "employe" shall include any employe, and shall not be limited to the employes of a particular employer, unless the act explicitly states otherwise, and shall include any individual whose work has ceased as a consequence of, or in connection with, any current labor dispute, or because of any unfair labor practice, and who has not obtained any other regular and substantially equivalent employment, but shall not include any individual employed as an agricultural laborer, or in the domestic service of any person in the home of such person, or any individual employed by his parent or spouse. The term "employe" shall not include an independent contractor.(d.1) The term "independent contractor" shall mean an individual who is free from control and direction in connection with the performance of a service, both under the contract for the performance of the service and is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession or business of the same nature as that involved in the service and the service is performed outside the usual course of the business of an employer.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Notice and Regulations.--(a) The board shall 20260SB1268PN1615 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promulgate regulations requiring each employer to post and maintain, in conspicuous places where notices to employes and applicants for employment are customarily posted, both physically and electronically, a notice providing the rights and protections afforded to employes under this act. The board shall make available to the public the form and text of the notice. The board shall promulgate regulations requiring employers to notify each new employe of the information contained in the notice described under this subsection.(b) The board shall promulgate regulations requiring an employer of employes in the bargaining unit to, no later than two business days after the board orders an election or certifies the results of an election, whichever is earlier, under section seven of this act, provide a voter list to a labor organization that has petitioned to represent the employes. The voter list shall include the names of all employes in the bargaining unit and such employes' home addresses, work locations, shifts, job classifications, and, if available to the employer, personal landline and mobile telephone numbers and work and personal email addresses.Section 3. Section 6(1) of the act is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 6. Unfair Labor Practices.--(1) It shall be an unfair labor practice for an employer--* * *(g) To require or coerce an employe to attend or participate in the employer's campaign activities unrelated to the employe's job duties.(h) To enter into or attempt to enforce an agreement, express or implied, whereby prior to a dispute to which the 20260SB1268PN1615 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreement applies, an employe undertakes or promises not to pursue, bring, join, litigate or support any kind of joint, class or collective claim arising from or relating to the employment of the employe in any forum that, but for the agreement, is of competent jurisdiction.(i) To coerce an employe into undertaking or promising not to pursue, bring, join, litigate or support any kind of joint, class or collective claim arising from or relating to the employment of the employe.(j) To retaliate or threaten to retaliate against an employe for refusing to undertake or promise not to pursue, bring, join, litigate or support any kind of joint, class or collective claim arising from or relating to the employment of the employe: Provided, That any agreement that violates this clause or results from a violation of this clause shall be to that extent unenforceable and void. This clause shall not apply to an agreement embodied in or expressly permitted by a contract between an employer and a labor organization.* * *Section 4. Section 7(c) and (d) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 7. Representatives and Elections.--* * *(c) (1) Whenever a question arises concerning the representation of employes the board may, and, upon request of a labor organization, or an employer who has not committed an act herein defined as unfair labor practice, or any group of employes in an appropriate unit representing by petition thirty per centum or more of the employes of that unit, shall investigate such controversy and certify to the parties, in writing, the name or names of the representatives who have been 20260SB1268PN1615 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designated or selected. In any such investigation, the board shall provide for an appropriate hearing upon due notice, either in conjunction with a proceeding under section eight, or otherwise, and may utilize any suitable method to ascertain such representatives, except that if either party to the controversy so requests, a secret ballot of employes shall be taken within twenty days after such request is filed. Any certification of representatives by the board shall be binding for a period of one year, or for a longer period if the contract so provides, even though the unit may have changed its labor organization membership.(2) Whenever a petition has been filed, if the board finds that, in an election under this section, a majority of the valid votes cast in a unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining have not been cast in favor of representation by the labor organization, the board shall dismiss the petition.(3) If a majority of the valid votes cast in a unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining have not been cast in favor of representation by the labor organization and the board determines that the election should be set aside because the employer has committed a violation of this act or otherwise interfered with a fair election and if the employer has not demonstrated that the violation or other interference is unlikely to have affected the outcome of the election, the board shall, without ordering a new election, certify the labor organization as the representative of the employes in the unit and issue an order requiring the employer to bargain with the labor organization if, at any time during the period beginning one year preceding the date of the commencement of the election and ending on the date upon which the board makes the 20260SB1268PN1615 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determination of a violation or other interference, a majority of the employes in the bargaining unit have signed authorizations designating the labor organization as their collective bargaining representative.(d) Whenever an order of the board, made pursuant to section eight, subsection (c), is based, in whole or in part, upon facts certified following an investigation pursuant to subsection [(c)] (c)(1) of this section, and there is a petition for the enforcement or review of such order, such certification and the record of such investigation shall be included in the transcript of the entire record required to be filed under subsections (a) or (b) of section nine, and thereupon the decree of the court enforcing, modifying or setting aside, in whole or in part, the order of the board, shall be made and entered upon the pleadings, testimony, and proceedings set forth in such transcript.(e) Whenever a petition has been filed, in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board, by an employe or group of employes or an individual or labor organization acting on the employe's behalf alleging that a substantial number of employes wish to be represented for collective bargaining and that the employer declines to recognize their representative as the representative or assert that the individual or labor organization, which has been certified or is being recognized by the employer as the bargaining representative, is no longer a representative, the board shall investigate the petition and, if the board has reasonable cause to believe that a question of representation affecting commerce exists, shall provide for an appropriate hearing upon due notice. The hearing shall be conducted by an employe of the department appointed by the 20260SB1268PN1615 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Secretary of Labor and Industry, who shall not make any recommendations with respect to the petition. If the board finds upon the record of the hearing that a question of representation exists, the board shall direct an election by secret ballot and shall certify the results of the election. No employer shall have standing as a party or to intervene in any representation proceeding under this subsection.(f) If the board finds that, in an election under this section, a majority of the valid votes cast in a unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining have been cast in favor of representation by the labor organization, the board shall certify the labor organization as the representative of the employes in the unit and shall issue an order requiring the employer of the employes to collectively bargain with the labor organization.(g) Except as provided under section 7(c)(3), if the board determines that an election under this section should be set aside, the board shall order a new election with appropriate additional safeguards necessary to ensure a fair election process, except in cases where the board issues a collective bargaining order.Section 5. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 7.1. Initial Collective Bargaining Agreement.--For an initial collective bargaining agreement following certification or recognition of a labor organization, the following shall apply--(a) No later than ten days after receiving a written request for collective bargaining from an individual or labor organization that has been newly certified as a representative, or within a period as the parties agree upon, the parties shall meet and commence to bargain 20260SB1268PN1615 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 collectively and shall make every reasonable effort to conclude and sign a collective bargaining agreement.(b) If, after the expiration of the ninety-day period beginning on the date on which collective bargaining is commenced, or an additional period as the parties may agree upon, the parties have failed to reach an agreement, either party may notify the board of the existence of a dispute and request mediation. When a request is received, the board shall promptly communicate with the parties and to use its best efforts, by mediation and conciliation, to bring the parties to agreement.(c) If, after the expiration of the thirty-day period beginning on the date on which the request for mediation is made, or an additional period as the parties may agree upon, the board is not able to bring the parties to agreement by mediation and conciliation, the board shall refer the dispute to a tripartite arbitration panel comprised of one member selected by the labor organization, one member selected by the employer and one neutral member mutually agreed to by the parties. A majority of the tripartite arbitration panel shall render a decision settling the dispute and a decision shall be binding upon the parties for a period of two years, unless amended during that period by written consent of the parties. A decision shall be based on the following--(1) The employer's financial status and prospects.(2) The size and type of the employer's operations and business.(3) The employes' cost of living.(4) The employes' ability to sustain themselves, their families and their dependents on the wages and benefits they 20260SB1268PN1615 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 earn from the employer.(5) The wages and benefits other employers in the same industry provide their employes.Section 6. Section 8 of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 8. Prevention of Unfair Labor Practices.--* * *(g) If the board finds that an employer has discriminated against an employe in violation of this act or has committed a violation of this act which results in the discharge of an employe or other serious economic harm to an employe, the board shall award the employe back pay without any reduction, including any reduction based on the employe's interim earnings or failure to earn interim earnings, front pay, consequential damages and an additional amount as liquidated damages equal to two times the amount of damages awarded. Relief under this subsection may not be denied on the basis that the employe is, or was during the time of relevant employment or during the back pay period, an unauthorized alien as defined in 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(h)(3) (relating to unlawful employment of aliens) or any other provision of Federal law relating to the unlawful employment of aliens.(h) (1) Each order of the board shall take effect upon issuance of the order, unless otherwise directed by the board, and shall remain in effect unless modified by the board or unless a court of competent jurisdiction issues a superseding order.(2) Any person who fails or neglects to obey an order of the board shall forfeit and pay to the board a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation, which shall accrue to the board and may be recovered in a civil 20260SB1268PN1615 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 action brought by the board. Action by the board under this clause may not be made until thirty days following the issuance of an order. Each violation of the order shall be a separate offense, except that, in the case of a violation in which a person fails to obey or neglects to obey a final order of the board, each day such failure or neglect continues shall be deemed a separate offense.(3) If, after having provided a person with notice and an opportunity to be heard regarding a civil action under clause (2) for the enforcement of an order, the court determines that the order of the board was regularly made and duly served and that the person is in violation of the same, the court shall enforce the order by an injunction or other proper process, mandatory or otherwise, to restrain the person or entity or the officers, agent or representatives of the person or entity, from further violation of the order, or enjoin the person or entity, officers, agents or representatives to obey the order.Section 7. Section 11 of the act is amended to read:Section 11. Penalties.--(a) Any person who shall wilfully resist, prevent, impede or interfere with any member of the board, or any of its agents, in the performance of duties pursuant to this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(b) If the board, or any agent designated by the board, determines that an employer has violated section 4.1 or regulations issued thereunder, the board shall--(1) State the findings of fact supporting the determination.(2) Issue and cause to be served on the employer an order 20260SB1268PN1615 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requiring that the employer comply with section 4.1 or regulations issued thereunder.(3) Impose a civil penalty in an amount determined appropriate by the board, except that in no case shall the amount of the penalty exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.(c) (1) An employer who commits an unfair labor practice under section six that results in the discharge of an employe or other serious economic harm to an employe, shall, in addition to any remedy ordered by the board, be subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each violation, except that the board shall double the amount of the penalty, to an amount not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), in any case where the employer has within the preceding five years committed another violation of section six.(2) In determining the amount of a civil penalty under this clause, the board shall consider the following--(i) If the unfair labor practice was knowingly committed.(ii) The impact of the unfair labor practice on the charging party, on other persons seeking to exercise rights guaranteed by this act and on the public interest.(iii) The gross income of the employer.(3) If the board determines, based on the particular facts and circumstances presented, that a director's or officer's personal liability is warranted, a civil penalty for a violation described under this subsection may be assessed against a director or officer of the employer who directed or committed the violation, had established a policy that led to the violation or had actual or constructive knowledge of and the 20260SB1268PN1615 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority to prevent the violation and failed to prevent the violation.(d) The following shall apply to the right to civil action--(1) Any person who is injured by reason of a violation of section six may, after sixty days following the filing of a charge with the board alleging an unfair labor practice, bring a civil action in the appropriate court against the employer within ninety days after the expiration of the sixty-day period or the date the board notifies the person that no complaint shall be heard by the board, whichever occurs earlier, provided that the board has not filed a petition under this act prior to the expiration of the sixty-day period. Relief under this subsection may not be denied on the basis that the employe is, or was during the time of relevant employment or during the back pay period, an unauthorized alien as defined in 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(h)(3) (relating to unlawful employment of aliens) or any other provision of Federal law relating to the unlawful employment of aliens.(2) Relief granted in an action under clause (1) may include any of the following:(i) back pay without any reduction, including any reduction based on the employe's interim earnings or failure to earn interim earnings;(ii) front pay, when appropriate;(iii) consequential damages;(iv) an additional amount as liquidated damages equal to two times the cumulative amount of damages awarded under subclauses (i), (ii) and (iii);(v) in appropriate cases, punitive damages in accordance with clause (4); and20260SB1268PN1615 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) any other relief authorized under 42 U.S.C. § 2000e-5(g) (relating to enforcement provisions) or under 42 U.S.C. § 1981a(b) (relating to damages in cases of intentional discrimination in employment) (this only applies to actions brought under sections 706 or 717 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and discrimination relating to unlawful intentional discrimination or violations under the Americans with Disabilities Act) . (3) In any civil action under this clause, the court may allow the prevailing party reasonable attorney fees, including expert fees, and other reasonable costs associated with maintaining the action.(4) In awarding punitive damages under clause (2)(v), the court shall consider if the unfair labor practice was knowingly committed, the impact of the unfair labor practice on the charging party, on other persons seeking to exercise rights guaranteed by this act and on the public interest, and the gross income of the employer.Section 8. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1268PN1615 - 13 - 12345678910111213141516171819